Utah statutes.
7-9-18.   Expulsion of member.

(1) The board of directors or board-designated representatives may expel from the credit union any member who has not carried out his engagements with the credit union, or neglected or refused to comply with the credit union board policies, provisions of this chapter, or of the credit union bylaws.

(2)  If the member whose expulsion is under consideration is a member of the board of directors or credit committee, the supervisory committee shall call a special meeting of the members to hear the facts and act upon the proposed expulsion.



Amended by Chapter 182, 1996 General Session

